Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Communications Carriers Section.

Sec. 42.04.100.
Communications carriers section.

There is established within the commission a communications carriers section that shall develop, recommend, and administer policies and programs with respect to the regulation of rates, services, accounting, and facilities of communications common carriers within the state involving the use of wire, cable, radio, and space satellites.

History.

(§ 1 ch 25 SLA 1999)

Sec. 42.04.150.
Public advocacy section. [Repealed, E.O. No. 111, § 4 (2003). For current law, see AS 44.23.020(e).]